Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-105
Effect of assignment; when assignment agreement effective.

(a) An assignee obtains the rights, title, and interests of the assignor in the assigned assets.

(b) If the assignor is an organization, an assignee obtains the rights, title, and interests of the assignor in assets acquired after the assignment.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(12) of section 6-110, an assignee takes each assigned asset subject to an existing interest in the asset held by another person.

(d) An assignee holds the assigned assets subject to the assignee's duties under section 6-109.

(e) An assignment is subject to other law under which the assignment may be fraudulent or otherwise voidable.

(f) The effective date of an assignment agreement is the date the agreement is signed by the last party to the agreement that is required to sign the agreement unless a later date is identified in the agreement as the effective date.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 5.
July 18, 2026